src/noun-amh-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols     +Masc +Fem  +Sg  +pl  +Def  +InDef  +nom +accus 

LEXICON Root
	 Possessive;
	 Nouns&Adjectives;
LEXICON Possessive
yä 	Nouns&Adjectives;	!Adjectives and nouns have the same form, they do inflect in the way.
	 
LEXICON Nouns&Adjectives	
lǝjǝ	Number; !regular
Xähǝya	Number;	
k'onǝjo	Number;
räjǝmǝ	Number;
wuha	Definiteness; 	!uncountable
 
LEXICON Number
+Sg:0	Gender;
+pl:oc'ǝ	Definiteness;

LEXICON Gender
+Masc:0	Definiteness;
+Fem:it	Definiteness;
 
LEXICON Definiteness
+Def:u	Case;
+InDef:0	   #;

LEXICON Case
+nom:0	 #;
+accus:nǝ	#;            !+Def is a prerequisite for +accus(+InDef+accus is out)

!there are few nouns which are inherently  gender assigned becasue of their near contact witht the language speaking community; since thier number is very limited I prefer to list them than to include in the derivation:
! +Masc : bäre,korma, bal , awra, kiräne
!+Fem: lam, bazra, gidär, mist, k'eb
